Utah statutes.
61-2-7.2.   Reporting requirements.
A licensee shall notify the division of the following by sending the division
a signed statement within ten business days of:
(1) (a)  a conviction of a criminal offense;
(b)  the entry of a plea in abeyance to a criminal offense; or
(c)  the potential resolution of a criminal case by:
(i)  a diversion agreement; or
(ii)  any other agreement under which a criminal charge is held in suspense
for a period of time; or
(2)  filing a personal or brokerage bankruptcy.
